Arkansas, session 2025, HB1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-104(d)(2), concerning the creation of
the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System and
the appointment of an executive director, is amended to read as follows to
formally create the name of an official:
(d)(2) The board shall appoint an executive director Executive
Director of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System who shall be the
executive administrative officer of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System and shall also be ex officio secretary of the board, but who shall
have no vote on questions before the board and who shall be directly
responsible to the board.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-10-107(b), concerning the time by which
certain newly created rules of the pension board must have been adopted, is
repealed as obsolete.
(b) The rules and procedures shall be adopted by May 1, 2004.

*LJH124*
01/31/2025 10:22:59 AM LJH124

HB1362
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-11-429 is repealed because it is also
codified at § 14-52-106.
24-11-429. Vacation pay.
The head or chief of each police department shall arrange that each
employee shall be granted an annual vacation of not fewer than fifteen (15)
working days with full pay.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.












01/31/2025 10:22:59 AM LJH124